California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 70.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100303.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made with any labor organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(b) The VTA shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise
 provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 71.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100304.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the VTA and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, either party may request mediation services of the State Conciliation Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 72.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100305.

If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the VTA and the accredited representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement either on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, upon the agreement of both the VTA and the representatives of the employees, the dispute may be submitted to an arbitration board and the decision of the majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding. The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district and two representatives of the labor organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of a fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of
 five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the State Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the VTA shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the labor organization and the VTA have stricken four names, shall be designated as the fifth arbitrator and chairman of the board of arbitration. The labor organization and the VTA shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties thereto. Each party shall be responsible for the expense of the presentation of its case. All other expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties and said expenses may include the making of a verbatim record of the proceedings and transcript of that record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 73.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100307.

(a) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code is not applicable to the VTA.

(b) The amendments to this section made at the 1995–96 Regular Session are not intended to modify, and shall not have the effect of modifying, an existing bargaining unit determination made by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 100301.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 75.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100308.

County employees and employees of the Santa Clara County Congestion Management Agency who, on a date or dates determined by the board of directors, terminate their employment and immediately thereafter become employees of the VTA, shall transfer to the VTA, and the VTA shall assume liability for, all of their accrued and unused vacation, sick leave, personal leave, compensating time off, STO balances, and days of accrued service in accordance with the records of their former employer in lieu of any payment by the former employer for those balances. Those employees who were covered by a county or congestion management agency pension plan shall be entitled to the same or equivalent rights, options, privileges, benefits, obligations, accrued service, and status under the
 pension plan of the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 76.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100309.

(a) It is a primary purpose of this article to promote the improvement of personnel management and employer-employee relations within the VTA by providing a uniform basis for recognizing the right of employees to join employee organizations of their own choice, to be represented, to select one employee organization as the exclusive representative of the employees in an appropriate unit, and to afford employees a voice at work.

(b) The Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code, and the powers and duties of
 the Public Employment Relations Board as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall have jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 100310 to enforce this article and the regulations of the Public Employment Relations Board shall apply to this article. The Public Employment Relations Board shall perform its duties under this section consistent with its regulations and may make additional regulations. The
 Public Employment Relations Board may also adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this article as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption, amendment, or repeal of regulations pursuant to this subdivision is conclusively presumed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100310.

(a) This article shall not displace or supplant the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3610) of Division 4.5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the impasse resolution and injunctive relief procedures provided for pursuant to Sections 3612 to 3614, inclusive, of the Government Code shall remain exclusive.

(b) (1) An exclusive representative for employees of the VTA may select to move one or more of its represented bargaining units to the jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board for unfair practice charges. A selection for Public Employment Relations Board jurisdiction pursuant to this paragraph with regard to a bargaining unit shall be irrevocable for that unit. The exclusive representative shall file notification of such a selection with the general counsel of the Public Employment Relations Board, or a designee, and serve one or more of the following:

(A) The general manager, chief executive officer, or the equivalent, of the VTA.

(B) The general legal counsel, or the
 equivalent, of the VTA.

(C) The VTA, pursuant to applicable regulations.

(2) If a selection is made pursuant to paragraph (1) for Public Employment Relations Board jurisdiction over unfair practice charges, the initial determination as to whether the charge of unfair practice is justified and, if so, the appropriate remedy necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article, is a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the Public Employment Relations Board shall not award strike-preparation expenses as
 damages and shall not award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 789, Sec. 2.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100311.

The VTA shall give reasonable written notice to an exclusive representative of its intent to make any change to matters within the scope of representation of the employees represented by the exclusive representative for purposes of providing the exclusive representative a reasonable amount of time to negotiate with the VTA regarding the proposed changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 789, Sec. 3.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

100312.

(a) Any charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of that board not to issue a complaint in such a case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from that decision or order.

(b) A petition for a writ of extraordinary relief shall be filed in the district court of appeal having jurisdiction over any county in which the VTA operates. The petition shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, or order denying reconsideration, as applicable. Upon the filing of
 the petition, the court shall cause notice to be served upon the Public Employment Relations Board and thereafter shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless that time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper, and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part, the decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board. The findings of the Public Employment Relations Board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. Title 1
 (commencing with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superseded by this section, apply to proceedings pursuant to this section.

(c) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a Public Employment Relations Board decision or order has expired, the Public Employment Relations Board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or superior court having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The Public Employment Relations Board shall respond within 10 days to any inquiry from a party to the action as to why the Public Employment Relations Board has not sought court enforcement of the final decision or order. If the response does not indicate that there has been compliance
 with the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, the Public Employment Relations Board shall seek enforcement of the final decision or order upon the request of the party. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, and appropriate evidence disclosing the failure to comply with the decision or order. If, after the hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to the procedures established by the Public Employment Relations Board and that the person or entity refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce the order by writ of mandamus or other proper process. The court may not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 454, Sec. 1.   (AB 1510)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Rights of Employees of Existing Facilities [100350. - 100351.]

100350.

(a) Whenever the VTA acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of the public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by said utility for at least 75 days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the VTA without examination and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

(b) Whenever the VTA acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, the VTA shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts.

(c) The provisions of this section apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 78.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100351.

Whenever the VTA acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of the pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to the established system. The outstanding obligations and liabilities of the public utility by reason of the pension plan shall be considered and taken into account and allowance made therefor in the purchase price of the public utility. The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in this section and the benefits that are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 79.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pension Plan [100370. - 100372.]

100370.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the VTA and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them. The adoption, terms, and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the VTA in a bargaining unit represented by a labor organization shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between the labor organization and the VTA. For purposes of this section, “officers” does not include members of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 80.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100371.

The board may contract with the board of administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and enter all or any portion of its employees under that system if no employees of the VTA in a bargaining unit that is represented by a labor organization are included in the contract except as authorized by a collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 81.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100372.

All persons receiving pension benefits from an acquired public utility and all persons entitled to pension benefits under any pension plan of the acquired public utility may become members or receive pensions under a pension plan established by the VTA by mutual agreement of the persons and the VTA. The agreement may provide for the waiver of all rights, privileges, benefits, and status with respect to the pension plan of the acquired public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 82.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Other Benefits [100380. - 100381.]

100380.

The VTA shall take the steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the VTA and its employees under Title 2 of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 83.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100381.

The VTA shall take the steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the VTA and its employees under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation disability, and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 84.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds and Other Evidences of Indebtedness [100400. - 100492.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization and Issuance of General Obligation Bonds [100400. - 100413.]

100400.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the VTA to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, or repair of any or all improvements, works, property, or facilities, authorized by this part or necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the powers of the VTA, or for any other purpose authorized by this part, the board shall, by ordinance, adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held within the boundaries of the VTA for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the VTA, if the total amount of bonds issued and outstanding pursuant to this article do not exceed 15 percent of the assessed value of the
 taxable property of the VTA as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the County of Santa Clara. The ordinance shall state:

(a) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant, and other fees; bond and other reserve funds; working capital; bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter; and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(d) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 50 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 7 percent per annum.

(f) The proposition to be submitted to the voters, which may include one or more purposes.

(g) The date of the election.

(h) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for or against the measure.

(i) The ordinance may also contain a statement that the retail transaction and use tax mentioned in Article 9 (commencing with Section 100250) of Chapter 5, or
 a stated portion thereof, shall be levied, or continued to be levied, and used to the extent required to pay principal of and interest on the bonds as they become due, to provide for any sinking fund payments required therefor, or to create or maintain any reserve fund required therefor.

(j) The ordinance may also contain any other matters authorized by this part or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 85.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100401.

Notice of holding of the election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the ordinance calling the election in at least one newspaper published within the boundaries of the VTA. No other notice of the election need be given. Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, the election shall be conducted as other district elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 86.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100402.

If any proposition is defeated by the electors, the board shall not call another election on a substantially similar proposition to be held within six months after the prior election. If a petition requesting submission of such a proposition, signed by 15 percent of the district electors, as shown by the votes cast for all candidates for governor within the district at the last gubernatorial election, is filed with the board, it may call an election before the expiration of six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100403.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote for it, then the board may, by resolution, at a time or times as it deems proper, issue bonds of the VTA for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized and may from time to time, by resolution, provide for the issuance of amounts as the necessity thereof may appear, until the full amount of the bonds authorized shall have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on an anniversary of its date. The maximum term the bonds of any series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 50 years from the date of each series respectively. In the
 resolution or resolutions, the board shall prescribe the form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 87.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100404.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 7 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds or any series thereof may be for any period not exceeding one year as determined by the board. In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of the bonds, the board may also provide for call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at times and prices and upon other terms as it may specify, but no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon. The denomination or denominations of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than
 one thousand dollars ($1,000). The principal of and interest on the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the VTA or at another other place or places as may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holders of the bonds. The bonds, or the series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairman of the board and the treasurer, countersigned by the secretary and the official seal of the VTA attached. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the treasurer. All signatures, countersignatures, and the seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures or countersignatures on the bonds shall be manually affixed. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, his signature is as effective as if he had remained in
 office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 88.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100405.

The bonds may be sold as the board determines by resolution but for not less than par. Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100406.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100407.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes for which the debt was incurred, which purposes shall be in conformity with an approved general transit plan or element thereof then in effect. When those purposes have been accomplished any moneys remaining in the improvement fund (a) shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds, or (b) shall be placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of
 outstanding bonds of the VTA from time to time in the open market at prices and in a manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as the board may determine. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 89.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100408.

After the expiration of three years after a bond election the board may determine, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board, that any or all of the bonds authorized at the election remaining unsold shall not be issued or sold. When the ordinance takes effect, the authorization to issue such bonds shall become void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100409.

Whenever the board deems that the expenditure of money for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized by the voters is impractical or unwise, it may, by ordinance adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the board, so declare and call an election to be held within the boundaries of the VTA for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of the bonds for some other purposes or, in the case where bonds have been sold, the proposition to use the proceeds for some other purposes. The procedure, so far as applicable, shall be the same as when a bond proposition is originally submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 90.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100410.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the VTA upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner which it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all or any part of the principal of outstanding bonds, the interest thereon, and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity and all expenses of the refunding. The provisions of this article for issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of the refunding bonds, except that (a) no election need be called or held for the purpose of authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, and (b) when refunding bonds are to be
 exchanged for outstanding bonds, the method of exchange shall be as determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 91.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100411.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 53500) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 92.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100412.

Any bonds which shall be issued under the provisions of this article shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within the State of California, such money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this part. Whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as
 security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the bonds issued under this part may be so used. The provisions of this article shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

100413.

If bonds are authorized that contain a provision for special taxes under subdivision (i) of Section 100400, the board may enter into such convenants as may be deemed proper to provide for issuance of additional parity bonds and the priority and pledge of special taxes; and such other covenants as are customary or desirable in the issuance of any bonds payable out of special funds or as are necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure the bonds or tending to make them more marketable, subject to the provisions of the ordinance calling the bond election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [100450. - 100451.]

100450.

The VTA may issue bonds, payable from revenue of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the VTA, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions of which are applicable to the VTA, except that these bonds may be paid, in whole or in part, from revenues made available under Article 9 (commencing with Section 100250) of Chapter 5 and, in that case, the bonds may be issued without an election if the resolution authorizing the bonds provides that the retail transactions and use tax shall continue to be imposed under that Article 9 until the bonds are fully paid or provision has been made for their payment in
 full.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 93.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100451.

The VTA is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include the system or any or all transit facilities and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the VTA. The VTA may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the VTA or, in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of those
 transit facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the VTA from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the transit facilities authorized hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 94.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equipment Trust Certificates [100460. - 100463.]

100460.

The VTA shall have power to purchase transit equipment such as cars, trolley buses, and motor buses, or rolling equipment; and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of transit equipment and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. Payment for the equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable from any source or sources of funds specified in certificates that are or will be legally available to the VTA. Title to the equipment shall not rest in
 the VTA until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 95.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100461.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the State of California as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct the trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the VTA and may authorize the VTA to execute and deliver simultaneously therewith an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 96.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100462.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds. These agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the VTA and shall contain covenants, conditions, and provisions that may be deemed necessary or appropriate to ensure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from legally available sources of funds specified in the certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 97.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100463.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 98.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement Acts and Special Benefit Districts [100470. - 100471.]

100470.

The Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 are applicable to the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 99.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100471.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code are applicable to the VTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 100.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Temporary Borrowing [100482. - 100483.]

100482.

The VTA may borrow money in accordance with the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), or of Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 101.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100483.

The VTA may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds that have been authorized to be issued, but have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the same from time to time, but the maximum maturity of those notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original notes. The notes may be paid from any moneys of the VTA available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the VTA in anticipation of which they were issued. The notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds that the VTA has been authorized to issue,
 less the amount of any bonds of that authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. The notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that a resolution of the VTA authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 102.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [100490. - 100492.]

100490.

The VTA may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 103.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100491.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the VTA under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the State of California, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 381, Sec. 104.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100492.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the VTA of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability shall constitute a contract between the VTA and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable against the VTA, or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing contained in this part or in any